dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.kaz.lexc
LEXICON CASE

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;


LEXICON CASE-2  ! The difference from CASE is that CASE-2 doesn't continue
                ! with personal copula suffixes. Atm used only for <abe>
                ! thing /02082012, IS/

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

! <abe> thing doesn't take personal copula suffixes (JNW, please correct me),
! so SUBST reading of it is linked to CASE-2, not CASE.
! A counterexample could be e.g. "бәхет-сез-мен", but that's only because "бәхетсез"
! has lexicalised as an adjective.

! Note that allowing of the (scarcely existing) [X +<abe> +<pers.cop> (+ modalpcle)] sequence
! would require some additional rules in kaz-tat.t2x /02082012, IS/

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<advl%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

!%<abe%>:%>с%{I%}з ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;
%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR/SUBST ; ! <s>FIXME:NOTE: I am in favour for changing the tag to loc2
                                            ! ("DAGI"=loc2 and not "DAGI"=loc"DA"+attr"GI") But first
                                            ! I'll give some arguments in a mail to apertium-turkic</s>
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;                ! FIXME:CHECK:In Tatar this is considered to be an adverbializer, so
                                            ! no case endings after it. In Kazakh it should be the same /I.S./ 
LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
!%<adv%>:ш%{A%} # ;          ! FIXME: might not be quite the right place

LEXICON POSS-REAL  ! P_2

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSION ! I guess this was used once to implement some
                   ! recursive things, e.g. the sequence
                   ! [stem > poss-real > [ныкы]/дагы > poss-real > case]
                   ! Some gerunds link to it /IS/
POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON 

POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC ;
ABE-ETC ; ! FIXME check whether this is possible after adjectives and other
          ! subst. things.
          ! Maybe a better idea is to restrict it to nouns and pronouns.
          ! Actually, not all pronouns take it. "Синсез" vs "*үземсез".
          ! Be careful :) /IS to himself/

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (ADJ-COMMON)

! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! i.e. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;
CLIT ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivised and andverbialised;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# жақсы, тез

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;             !# жақсырақ іс

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# жақсыны таптым 
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   !# жақсырақты таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;     !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# ескі дос
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;             !# ескірек заманда

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                                      !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be pure overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# ұлттық тағам

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ;       ! FIXME:NOTE: <s>ADJ-COMMON is meant to be used as default cont. class
                            ! for verbal adjectives</s> (but not all verbal adjectives can get comparative
                            ! level ending --> consider A2 ). In contrast to <advl>, <subst> reading is what all
                            ! words acting like adjective can get.
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON V-ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ;  
CLIT ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

!FIXME
LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;    ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{K%} CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COND ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{K%} CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF-NO3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF

V-PERS-COP-SUF-NO3;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-EVID-SUF

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с # ;

 LEXICON Adjectives
американдық:американдық A4 ; ! ""
аталмыш:аталмыш A4 ; ! ""
ауылдық:ауылдық A4 ; ! ""
әлемдік:әлемдік A4 ; ! ""
британдық:британдық A4 ; ! ""
бүкілресейлік:бүкілресейлік A4 ; ! ""
бұқаралық:бұқаралық A4 ; ! ""
геологиялық:геологиялық A4 ; ! ""
дейінгі:дейінгі A4 ; ! ""
дүниежүзілік:дүниежүзілік A4 ; ! ""
еңбегі% сіңген:еңбегі% сіңген A4 ; ! ""
еуразиялық:еуразиялық A4 ; ! ""
еуропалық:еуропалық A4 ; ! ""
жаһандық:жаһандық A4 ; ! ""
кедендік:кедендік A4 ; ! ""
коммуналдық:коммуналдық A4 ; ! ""
коммунистік:коммунистік A4 ; ! ""
конституциялық:конституциялық A4 ; ! ""
күнгі:күнгі A4 ; ! ""
қазақстандық:қазақстандық A4 ; ! ""
қаржылық:қаржылық A4 ; ! ""
қырлы:қырлы A4 ; ! ""
қырлы:қырлы A4 ; ! ""
материалдық:материалдық A4 ; ! ""
мәлім:мәлім A4 ; ! ""
музыкалық:музыкалық A4 ; ! ""
органик:органик A4 ; ! ""
өндірістік:өндірістік A4 ; ! ""
президенттік:президенттік A4 ; ! ""
республикалық:республикалық A4 ; ! ""
техникалық:техникалық A4 ; ! ""
тропиктік:тропиктік A4 ; ! ""
федералдық:федералдық A4 ; ! ""
халал:халал A4 ; ! ""
химиялық:химиялық A4 ; ! ""
шетелдік:шетелдік A4 ; ! "foreign"
арнаулы:арнаулы A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
атақты:атақты A3 ; ! ""
байланысты:байланысты A3 ; ! ""
бар:бар A3 ; ! ""
бастапқы:бастапқы A3 ; ! ""
бергі:бергі A3 ; ! "on the near side"
бірік:бірік A3 ; ! ""
бүгінгі:бүгінгі A3 ; ! "today's"
дәстүрлі:дәстүрлі A3 ; ! ""
жазғы:жазғы A3 ; ! ""
жасар:жасар A3 ; ! "after numerals: of ageX"
жеке:жеке A3 ; ! "separate"
жоқ:жоқ A3 ;
жылғы:жылғы A3 ; ! "year's"
жылдық:жылдық A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
ішкі:ішкі A3 ; ! "internal"
кәсіби:кәсіби A3 ; ! ""
келесі:келесі A3 ; ! ""
кібісе:кібісе A3 ; ! ""
көктемгі:көктемгі A3 ; ! ""
көрнекті:көрнекті A3 ; ! ""
көшпелі:көшпелі A3 ; ! ""
кушма:кушма A3 ; ! ""
қос:қос A3 ; ! ""
лауазымды:лауазымды A3 ; ! ""
негізгі:негізгі A3 ; ! "basic, fundamental"
сай:сай A3 ; ! ""
танымал:танымал A3 ; ! ""
тәуелді:тәуелді A3 ; ! ""
туған:туған A3 ; ! "родной"
туыс:туыс A3 ; ! ""
тұрғын:тұрғын A3 ; ! ""
үздік:үздік A3 ; ! ""
федеральды:федеральды A3 ; ! "федеральный"
ынтымақты:ынтымақты A3 ; ! ""
ақшыл:ақшыл A2 ; ! ""
ащы:ащы A2 ; ! ""
әйгілі:әйгілі A2 ; ! ""
бағалы:бағалы A2 ; ! ""
байыпты:байыпты A2 ; ! ""
батпақты:батпақты A2 ; ! ""
бұрынгы:бұрынгы A2 ; ! ""
дербес:дербес A2 ; ! ""
дөңгелек:дөңгелек A2 ; ! "round, circular"
ежелгі:ежелгі A2 ; ! ""
ежелгі:ежелгі A2 ; ! ""
елеулі:елеулі A2 ; ! ""
жедел:жедел A2 ; ! ""
кейінгі:кейінгі A2 ; ! ""
кіші:кіші A2 ; ! ""
күрделі:күрделі A2 ; ! ""
күрделі:күрделі A2 ; ! ""
қазіргі:қазіргі A2 ; ! ""
қатаң:қатаң A2 ; ! ""
құнды:құнды A2 ; ! ""
қызғылт:қызғылт A2 ; ! ""
лайық:лайық A2 ; ! ""
маңызды:маңызды A2 ; ! ""
орташа:орташа A2 ; ! ""
салтанатты:салтанатты A2 ; ! ""
тәріздес:тәріздес A2 ; ! ""
тәрізді:тәрізді A2 ; ! ""
тәуелді:тәуелді A2 ; ! ""
тиісті:тиісті A2 ; ! ""
төзімді:төзімді A2 ; ! ""
төзімді:төзімді A2 ; ! ""
шағын:шағын A2 ; ! ""
шағын:шағын A2 ; ! ""
шөптесін:шөптесін A2 ; ! ""
ылғалды:ылғалды A2 ; ! ""
активті:активті A1 ; ! ""
аласа:аласа A1 ; ! "low"
арнайы:арнайы A1 ; ! ""
астам:астам A1 ; ! ""
әдемі:әдемі A1 ; ! "beautiful"
әскери:әскери A1 ; ! "military"
белгілі:белгілі A1 ; ! "famous"
бос:бос A1 ; ! "empty, free, hollow"
ғылыми:ғылыми A1 ; ! "scientific"
дәмді:дәмді A1 ; ! "yummy"
дұрыс:дұрыс A1 ; ! "correct"
ерте:ерте A1 ; ! "early"
жайлы:жайлы A1 ; ! ""
жалпы:жалпы A1 ; ! "united,collected"
жарық:жарық A1 ; ! "light, enlighted"
жергілікті:жергілікті A1 ; ! "local"
жоғары:жоғары A1 ; ! "high"
жұқа:жұқа A1 ; ! "thin"
зор:зор A1 ; ! "huge"
кем:кем A1 ; ! ""
киелі:киелі A1 ; ! "holy"
көк:көк A1 ; ! "blue"
қадірлі:қадірлі A1 ; ! "precious"
қауқарсыз:қауқарсыз  A1 ; ! ""
қу:қу A1 ; ! "?crafty,сухой,высохший"
қысқа:қысқа A1 ; ! "short"
мықты:мықты A1 ; ! "strong/fast"
оппозициялық:оппозициялық A1 ; ! "opposition"
саяси:саяси A1 ; ! "political"
сұлу:сұлу A1 ; ! "beautiful"
тар:тар A1 ; ! ""
тік:тік A1 ; ! ""
түркі:түркі A1 ; ! "Turkic"
тын:тын A1 ; ! ""
ұқсас:ұқсас A1 ; ! "similar"
ыссы:ыссы A1 ; ! "hot"
үстінгі:үстінгі A1 ; ! "upper"
